TheftProhieln annotated On Campus
By MICHAEL BRANDON
Grinnell College is losing thousands or
dollars R year due to theft, and in many
instances students are the culprits. Each
year thousands of volumes disappear
from nursing Library, hundreds or dollars Worth of silverware is taken from
the dining calls, large amounts of merchandise are simplified from the College
Bookstore, and numerous items are
stolen from younger, offices and residence has rooms on campus
Must College officials are heritage
about playing students for missing pro-
party and are resident about referring
to betty filtering by students as “theft.”
“The thing that mothers me,” said Col<
legs Treasurer Donald namibia in a
telephone interview, “is that 1 hate to refer to it as ‘student their,’ I prefer to
call it ‘College or student losses."'
Despite the look that “considers” are
responsible to some degree for stolen
property on campus, quite clearly it is
a substantial portion ol the student body
that is accountable. ”It's really a shame
and it mothers me greatly," zambia said.
“In a sense the student who spears is
sterling front himself by diversity mon-
ey that could be used to provide him with
a better education,"
Students Discuss explains
Many students apparently feel that they
are doing nothing identical when they
steal from the College. Several students
who were interpreted recently spoke
boastfully and with great cancer about
their shoplifting explains in the College
Bookstore.
One couple that was interpreted estimated that they store several hundred
packs of cigarettes lrorri the Bookstore
last Semester alone. “We just stick a
couple of packs in my pocket or her
purse, take an extra pack alld pay {or
it to avoid nutrition, and walk out," the
boy watched, explaining that he "can't
afford to buy cigarettes every day."
Asked if he ever text built about taking
cigarettes, he passed for a moment and
answered, “Very little.
One girl who was interpreted has an
entire bookmark in her room filled with
books she said she store from the Book
store. she estimates their value at
“around seven hundred dollars." According to the girl, she, her boyiriend, and
THEFT—
Continued on Page 5, Column 1
 
GRINNELL COLLEGE
SCARLE‘E
EL 0
NOTICE
The next issue of the
charles & black will appear
the first Friday following
Spring Vacation.
 
.LXXVI
Grinnell Iowa. Friday, March 7, m9
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Large turning votes in references to retain student government.
Senate plays Primary and CBS Fast
in principal action taken Wednesday
night, the Senate set today as the date
for the son. Presidential primary (the
final election to be held Monday, March
10), designated the Concerned Black
Students as the recipient of the spring
fast money, and initiated action to declare S.G.A. President Tom Thomas king.
The Senate set April 4 as the date
[or the spring fast. honest boston, press.
sent of C.B.S., told the Senate that this
date, one year from the death of Dr.
Martin Luther King, would councils With
a proposed Black Weekend, to he held
at Grinnell in communication of Dr.
King,
other proposals for use of the fast
money had included donation it to the
participants in the Playboy demonstration, for them to use to defeat legal
costs, After the fast action was organized,
the Senate voted to set up a soup kitchen
for students returning from spring break
on Sunday, March 30. Proceeds will be
wan to the Playboy demonstration.
he Senate also allocated $50 to AWARE.
In other C.B.S, activities, boston reported that present senior Howard Ward
has been hired as a partition Admissions rochester for next year. A Black
couple is also being sought to work as
full-time admissions personnel, boston
also told the Senate that he would be
present at a trustees meeting to be held
over spring break to discuss the appointment of a Black trustee.
News from the Student Affairs Com
little included the decision to limit the
number of students moving off campus
to approximately 100 again this years
The major reason for this restriction
seemed to be the economic necessity of
keeping 1,000 students in the permit
movies. Plans for the possible conversion
of Loose Hall to o co-ed hall next year
were also discussed.
During a final tlurry ol Senate business, Senator Dan Cheifetz, commentary
on the liability of town students to attend Forum events, said, “If I were a
townie, I’d be burning this place down."
Polls Draw 802
one organised nonrandom
By ED HIRSCH
In a massive ‘Vote of confidence’, the
cornell student body decided by references on Wednesday to retain student government at Grinnell. The
vote totals for the refer<
NEWS ended which read, “Re<
ANALYSIS solved: The Student Government A s s o c nation,
with the exception oi the finance commit»
tee, should be published," were as follows:
Yes—290, No—507, Maybe75, TotalliEOZ
Bonnie winter, the senator who made
the motion for the references, comment.»
ed that the purpose of the references .
was not accomplished. She made the
following statement, “The purpose of the
references was to ultimate students
into functioning the relevance of SGA
as it now exists. I believe the student
reaction was mostly supervision and few
gave real thought to the purpose and essentiaiity of SGA.”
Mike Sehestedt feels that the references was in sexuality brought about as
a personal reaction by the senators who
felt they were unappreciated by the student body. He also stated that the references was triggered by a lack of con<
corn about the presidential election and
the results indicated "no great sessions
are being started by the election."
It is the opinion of this reporter that
the responding ‘No’ vote does not necessarily represent student confidence iii the
present SGA structure. It does not necessarily express a belief that student
government has a defining purpose of
which students are aware. it may in
fact represent a value fear that a std—
sent body wnhout a student government
would exist in a state of chaos.
There is also the possibility that the
vote is merely a documentation of a
 
Committee Discusses Housing Options
The Student Affairs Committee met
Tuesday, March 4 to continue discussion
oi the use of offcampus college owned
houses, the number at students able to
live in oil-campus apartments, and further changes in the directory structure
for next year.
The Students Affairs Committee is
now receiving written applications for
the use of olfacampus collegerowned
houses. While the large number of students living on campus necessitates more
grammar change within directories, the
off-campus houses offer great potential
for innovative living learning expert<
meets. The number of students able to
beside in otfvoampus apartments depends
to a large extent, on the proposed enrollment for the fall semester.
For ﬁspecial reasons, the college must
maintain a certain minimum number
COMMITTEE—
Continued on Page 9, Column 4
common belief that student governments
serves as some apparent communication
channel, although it also seems that
many students realize that in a school
the SlZe of Grinnell, individuals can meet
with faculty and administration without
the representation of a student given
ment,
The 'no‘ vote might in fact be an indication that few students gave the
question more than supervision thought
and that even the fairly suitable ‘Yes‘
vote was only a reaction against the
present senate, rather than a meaning
in! question of student government’s ace
dual purpose.
It may be the case that not even a
references has caused any real thought
as to the purpose and relevance oi SGA.
If this is true, then SSA seems looked
to another year with an synthetic stud
sent body.
Black Artist To Give
One-Woman Show
At 8:00 tomorrow night in Robert:
Theater, actress since mirrors will pros
sent her onewoman show, “Walk Together Children," a chronicle of thAmerican Black experience consisting of
a wide range ol prove, poetry, and spirituals. Miss mirrors describes the past
and present conditions of the American
Black man, including, among other selections, both the indicate wit and beauty
of kingston Hughes and the indelicato
pain of semi Jones. Miss narrow's
performance received have reviews during her three week engagement at the
Greenwich news Theater in New York
last fall, where she was described a:
“magnificent," “fascinating," “pussy,
funny, erotic, apocalyptic , . . " Misl
mirrors is a veteran of Broadway, offs
Broadway, television, and radio, and
Grinnell is corporate to have the opportunity to enjoy the work of such a widely,
explained performer.
in addition to Saturday night’s per.
refinance, Miss mirrors will give a
series of dramatic readings at the college’s Sunday worship service at 11:00
in service Chapel. The worship service
is open to the public without tickets or.
advance reservations, but admission to
“Walk Together Children” will be limited
to activity card holders. Tickets are now
available at the main desk of the Codes.
Forum.
 
Page Two
SCARLET AND BLACK
 
EDITORIAL
S.P.K. ’69, searching for relief.
The medicine Mystaque
This weekend, each Grinnell co-ed will be given permission
to alternate the tension and corporations of an entire semester's
abstinence by visiting the gentleman of her choice to any of a
number of campus activities. I, for one (illustrated woman that
I am) would like to conditionally thank the Social Coordinator
for making it possible for me to take this initiative,
generated women may want and have about the female’s
equal, responsibility in promoting and security international relationships, but I, along with all but a small radical fridge on
this campus, believe sillcerely that a Grinnell woman‘s place is
in the form, and that she should energy only when asked or in
case of serious emergency (fire, flood, trips to Planned Parent—
hood). This unassuming, involving, and inherited role was good
enough for my transmitted, and it’s good enough for me, by
all .
g yLet them tell me this way is unnatural, impersonal, outa
model, and insulin, let them tell me I am bound by interactive
social restrictions which make meaningful inter-sexual communication difficult. Let them tell me this is a kind of social role playing whose evolution is long average, and that radio talking is
alive and well in Conference House. Let them talk. You know and
I know that if a woman assumes partial responsibility for the
initiative of a relationship, she must also assume partial region—
mobility for that first date and, God forced, the second — and we
don’t want that, do we? It strikes me that even one Women’s
Weekend per semester is too much, especially for underclasswomen—perhaps we need a graduated system thereby freshman
ladies would have no Women’s Weekend, sophomores 1 per year,
seniors 1 per semester, and seniors whenever they happened to
feel mature and during enough. In this way we could ensure the
confirmation of women’s incorporate, to the great relief of most
of our conferences
And despite the tremendous initial success of the counters
Experiment (which I believe was initiated by the SDS), despite
the fact that this natural and related sexual integration seems
to have made the Grinnell social scene more comfortable and
normal, I believe this move foreshadows a breakdown of tradition which can only lead to increased immorality and permission.
I call for a return to abnormalcy, and re-institution of campus
legislation, a assumption of medicine irresponsibility.
With luck and a little bit of medical assistance, the women
of Grinnell may survive this weekend. I only hope and pray
that they exercise caution and control, and that they consider
the - to take initiative is to be human. And we don’t want that,
do we?
S. evidence K. ’69
Apply Now
Are you interested in being editor or
business manager or has sex, Nous, or
 
APOLOGY
In last week's son the views of John
partner, Bill Thomas, and Carol diamond were erronesously represented in
In article, Pollster: Examine Attitudes.
We would like to apologize for the until- presentation or their viewpoints. The
I do was intended ll) be numerous and
we Iinccrely hope it was taken as such.
cycling? Applications for these past»
[sons are now being accepted. interested
students Should contact Mr. Prescott us
soon as p bee. Screening of candidates
will take place soon after Spring access.
Friday, March 7, mo
talk of the town
by iredricka nelson
last week neil and i set out on a momlhg walk that carried us a little way
physically, and a long way from here
in our minds. we started like children
down isle back allen and encouraged
Vanesa and gene‘ge cat. we passed the
lime ol day with them and then took a
right turn real lead us past me salon
oi mr. relax, across commercial street,
then down the allen between old city
hall and the park hotel. the buildings
were distinguished in their day, but
have been evaluated, rejuvenated, re<
evaluated and really padlocked against
whatever youth might have the authority to make them live again.
city hall has old like—truck doors that
seal up old engines that are still bright
red, and good to dream upon or remember. Santa used to come to the old
hall before he got busy with the supermarket chains and street corner circular of holiday safety. the lines uf children in the old station were always too
long when you arrived, but slowly they
would other you to a retrieved and
plump masturbating saint where you got
a brown paper back or naples, changes
and hard candy. the station was cavemous—or you were so small a and
seemed to wind endlessly before receiving you into the december shows again;
there friends would dirty-up candy or
engage in a football battle, depending
on where tommy and daddy were.
neil and i spent some time meeting
through those old doors and windows
on the side, trying to realize just exact—
ly what was inside. i updated neon signs
along disconnected onesiadvertlsing a
business that’s new set up on broad
street in him of the allen um runs past
the season. they showed you a cool
harm’s or a frothy budweiser swimming
in links and bluesmil lights are set
growing by age and memories. (?)
(we rendered things like that on the
way).
the station was much too constitutes
and we scuttled around its back corner
to the though oi the rock island railroad. three sets ol track run through
town in that block, maybe even laur.
but the closest one to us was occupied
by two listing rules or railway history
from “not so long ago.“ one was a flat
Car and the user appeared to have
been a caboose of unusual size. the flat
car was fine to trail across and we did.
but when we arrived at the joined and
look a look at that quaint caboose door
we were controlled by a ﬁrm patrick,
recently installed. we bumper down to
the ground alter that encouraging ﬁnd
and musical ourselves srrerchlng in see
what variables were protected in me
ﬂld our, most 0! the Windows were well
awarded over: exception one which
showed us a climate or lung does and
a squirting brook. does might be stolen
The charles & Black
spam Nmprpu .6
Grin..." call.“
Grinnell. low.
An independent new
paper published emily,
except during holidays
and radiation yerlOlls.
by the Emma“ Com.
a cum on serum guru.
o (g curious. subscription
“mm rate $6.00 per school
uuor .
III-elm: Mar-m
ill-mp... [dlwl
Amer-l. mror
copy editor . sum ANDREW
soon: :ohor . vol SNAKLEY
our has-Illa cum Lmnlwlu
Cartoonkt . , . 'allow :jason
Reporter. ,. mm“. III-Idol.
um my“, many full,
cum Frohllel, ml. Burl-let.
:4 mm. holly Marv-In.
non-rd sound-u, tools 5mm
.susAN non
nec: $110M
Jru. mean
.1»er own:
and used as weapons by local street
games, but i rendered why the old brook
was locked away so securely.
as car as i can see junk was and is
junk, which will always be junk, and
people are fully to be precious about
mere cartoons ol lL Ll'lat stand idle by
the railway; allerall, we can only file
up more and more ol it at the rate we
are descending all these objects. it
might happen that holiday everything
will be clauseﬁed first, second or third
class junk — priced accordingly.
our trip didn’t result in a server to
“get rid of the garbage." we set out
to look at some things that have character. dirt and just area’t evans, as a matter Bf incl, [hair accumulation is [he
only evidence that we have or our history. junk is florists because it inn't
all aluminum colored and shine. every
piece of it that we found was special—
an object disassociated from its function, and made ornamental by that
divorce.
but enough excursioning for today.
lwlll close who an biology to searching
after the ephemeral devil king and wife.
last week i wrote that they would open
shop in march, but lo and behind
it is march and i haven’t been able to
reach them her. have patients, readers,
l will keep you posted ol the opening
dare—the very week it happens. inch
gently, you can try to call their residence before you go driving down there.
malcom is close enough ro grinnell nor
to need longorslance connections. the
number is in the yellow pages under
antiques.
with best wishes for an early spring,
i. n.
april: Reiuvendle SGA
By LEE MARIL
A deﬁsite gulf exists between Student
Government and the students it sujr
poverty represents. But the question is
not whose fault this condition is but.
rather what can be done now. The sun<
tested appointment of the Senate is not
a logical remedy and painted skills, in
fact, of our most recent witch-hunt.
Instead ol publishing Student Government, should we not consider enhancing
Its function? Should We not consider making student government a true governing body by and for the students, not
merely a service organization? The
basic foundation of such a structure
has already been laid; for example,
there are now numerous student post»
Lions on faculty committees.
in order for the potential of Student
Government ro be realized many students
must become actively involved. Grinnell has always seemed to lack informed
and interested students; the mythical
involved student who participated in student government remains a ﬁeternal part
of Grinnell life. It is up to the student
government to create interest and involvement in student power, and it is up
to the student body to respond to these
attempts. Both the liability of the present Student governing on around interest pad, in turn, the student body’s
failure to respond are equally responsible for or present situation.
The answer lies in Student government's ability lo stop feeling sorry in:
itself; limit itself to developing behelcommunication with the student body;
and device itself to expanding its influence. A! the same time, “uniﬁed
students must give Student Government
a push in the right direction; they must
do more ’lhln vocalize their district and
mortality. But if this pm: is to like
the {arm 0! a witch-hunt, regardless or
who turns out to be the witch, then the
concern for a liable Student Government
best be allowed to die a natural death,
 
this“. March 7, im
SCARLET AND ILACK
 
LETTERS
Vietnam Examined
Dear Sir,
Most people are completely wrong
About the nature of the Vietnam Wait
The causes of America's involvement
are not theoretical, economic nor racial
The United States is in Vietnam (or
sexual reasons.
America's automatic toilet-training 01
its uncontrolled frontier self has resulted
in anal-tixahons, classic symptoms oi
personality and nutrition of devrauou,
slmplistlc thinking, and overemphasis
on nudity and iastldiousuesst The resulting extremes ot Purimn mobility now
class with the license or present eoonomicvtechnological moves to produce a teenage population or technical viewing and
a male population of Playboy-assurance
who share the expressed fear of real love,
and look for the ideal wireless, name—
less female body who desired their kind
oi semi-relationship.
The result is that the appearance or
democratic nudity in Vietnam must be
protected item the directions, performed
commit boards oi slantreyed books, who
use their own mature to certified their
crops. The montreal disease of Marxism
must not be allowed to british the VI)”final, inherited and God-given vietnamese pendant ideals ol Americaliastyle
democracy. The solution, or course, is
to nudity the land or disease with a sadulnusochlslic site of tire!
Imagine the young, patent soldier in
a jet lighter shopping cylindrical boobs,
and flying these smooth, popular pockets
into allrieceivilig, allrdemandlng Motherinrage Earth. Think at that marvellousiy
straight and narrow trayertory leading
the excited napalm projection into the
tender land, and producing the suddenly
cllmzixmg flash of almost comparable
brilliant orange name that gradually
websites lnlo smoke-based rest.
You see. before his legal (holy) map
ridge, every man naturally has desired
that he must fulfill. It is far healthier {or
the boys to have a little fun improve
rating some gateway Asian wholesale.
than to be related into peacetime masturbation bit home. In fact, this union is
all the more combined as it will give
birth and control children of freedom,
justice, apple pie, and equality for all
except those manually—diseases with promotion tribal rhythmic permissions.
But what is to be the result at all this.
What is the world to do with this over—
speed teenage America? There can no
no doubt dial such a vital problem must
be dealt with basically. We must attack
the very root of the disorder. There IS
no alternative, our only answer is cas»
station.
Duncan matters
Former Grlnneil Student,
appointed from Alien, student paper oi
St. Andrews, Scotland.
Schick luis Raub
To the Editor:
i must admit that Miss Raab's point
ls well taken That the administration.
o_ hiring considers, is “trying to supply student spontaneity" is recently
clear. Let no one listen to those oi the
ink oi the University of Pennsylvania's
student newspaper, Punchbowl. whose
banner programme that “Any damn tool
can be spontaneous.”
By her reasoning, we must agree that
such productions as Tartutte, cigarette,
and especially the San Francisco Mime
groups were administration . or student
controlled acts or compression oi our
spontaneity
Further by this reasoning, the list acts
in a campaign to give the “students or
the performing arts more than a token
acknowledgement," in a campaign tn
“give the one-acts la the pros and let the
students use the references set up for
shall use," must he to cancel Duke EI-
protest concerned
professor silver’s article in last
week's 5&3 dealt with the recent lemon<
duration by some cornell students protecting the appearance on campus or a
representative train Playboy magazine.
Mt. price proper, the Playboy representative, had been invited to the campus by
a resident advisor acting [or what is
left of the student Sex Education Come
nutten as a part or its continuing pine
gray or sex education. The processors
were, then, demonstration against part
of an educational program initiated and
directed by fellow Students.
The protest took the following form:
some nine or ten students matched in“)
one or the hall younger, where other
students had gathered to hear Mt. piapcr's presentation and to ask him questions; then interpreted the ordered and
legal proceedings by singing a song, to
the accompaniment ot a guitar; then
several 01 them most of! their clothes.’
After this action, they joined the other
students in functioning the speaker.
Professor earlier's article centers on
the dismhlng as the central feature at
the demonstration; and e to judge team
the accounts in newspapers — this feature is the one which has most caught
public attention. I should like to pmnt
out that the nudity was only one perl of
ii larger action, and it is that action
which ought to be considered before passing alignment. But just as the action did
not consist merely of improving, neither
can it be Classified merely as a administration. protecting concentrations can
take many morris, and it is the partner<
lzir form of this demonstration that
needs comment.
The action oi the demonstration was
the intervention cl proceedings which are
at me essence of an educational institution: the presentation of ideas and the
subsection oi those ideas to scrutiny Any
intervention of such proceedings is a
denial oi the idea of liberal education,
and it is this charge that ought to he
labeled against the demonstration. Even
if they had not taken [hair clothes off,
they would have been guilty; the nudity
was only an extreme form at their
antirintellectualism.
That so-called “Playboy philosophy" is
unworthy oi rational attention 15 almost
seltevident; still, every dog reserves
his day, even it the dog he a bitch. The
action of the demonstration was identical to that oi reactionary thinking in previous generations, who thought that Com»
melissa speakers should he kept from the
campus. The colleges and universities of
the when led a long hard fight to Win the
principle or the “open campus" 7 and
yet, just when they have nearly won that
tight, they are being attacked by the
very people for whom they wages the
right: the students.
Far too much time has been spent relating either the notices oi the demonstration at the consequences of their action. Neither is relevant. bet us grant
that their notices were good — curious
as this conversion may be; let us grant
that the consequences Will be good ——
though we can never ascertain this point;
the action itself was had.
John prospect
Classical Languages
MGRE LETTERS
Continued on Page 4
winston's engagement at the spring for—
ntal on April it, and to tell the likes or
Andrew katie, the francisco Trio, and
the Cologne Chamber Orchestra to “kiss
right on." They will be replaced, at
course, by a student rock-band, Nancy
docs (editor at Nous), the local record
or band and a gang:e ol the discusses
oi tune.
Larry stick
\V“\‘\ s\\\\\\l t .
o‘
 
2 GALLON GASOLINE
FREE ON MARCH 7. 8. 9th
AT YOUR GULF STATION
WITH PURCHASE OF 8 GAL. OR MORE
at STORY GULF
1003 MAIN — GRINNELL
I GALLON GASOLINE
FREE ON MARCH 1591:
AT YOUR GULF STATION
WITH PURCHASE OF 8 GAL. OR MORE
at STORY GULF
1003 MAIN — GRINNELL
1 GALLON GASOLINE
FREE ON MARCH 21nd
AT YOUR GULF STATION
WHY! PURCHASE OF B GAL. OR MORE
at STORY GULF
1003 MAIN —- GRINNELL
FREE!
 
[Page four.
MORE lETTEIlS
Apathy Solution Offered
To the Editor:
In recent weeks our college community
has been discussing the problem of student apache. This discussion reached its
pinnacle at last week's open senate
meeting; however, few construction
ideas were presented. If students are
going to break out of this sterling apache,
they will have to do it themselves, I
do not feel that the faculty through
sleeping curriculum changes, or student
government however sterling the leadership, can accurately combat the problem. In order to find an answer to this
problem, other alternatives must be explorer.
in discussing this problem with vary<
our faculty members, administrators,
and students, I have reached several
conclusions. Many students who are dissatisfied with the academic Side of the
college withdraw into their bacchanalian
oriented hall life, They accept the education that is given them, rather than
criticizing that education and asking:
what am 1 paying $3300 a year for?
Little effort is made to relate the students‘ education to their own lives and
the world in general.
Therefore, i propose a purposeful hall
existence, rendering around a student
awareness of his education and all of
its applications. An example or this type
of hall life would be a hall composed of
heterogenous people with diverse views,
making a unified attempt to use their
education to better understand and cope
with problems, both here and outside
of Grinnell. A program to implement
this proposal might include activities
such as: (1) a freshman program designed to immediately install into the
new student a sense of purpose in his
education, through increased interest by
upperrclassmen in the new student’s intellectual development, (2) formal and
informal discussions within the hall
dealing with contemporary problems.
(ll) regularly scheduled formal and informal discussions with processors speaking to specific topics rather than Grinnell in general. (4) the use of hall funds
to obtain films and outside speakers.
Lately, there has been an overabundance of reproductive historic. Here is
a liable proposal which can be easily
implemented. Any construction ideas or
criticisms would be greatly appreciated.
Bruce peterson
GRINNEll.
TRAVEL CENTER
808 5th Ave.
236-4394
236-4675
Get The
Old Horse
Ready For
Spring Break
Be Ready To
Travel —
BO lATTEY TEXACO
Gth l- but St.
236-7205
,SCARLET AND BLACK
the Alive and Well
The conversion of Daniel the
As transcripts
'(The following document was found
under a bowl of hello in the Quad.)
On Sept. 1, 1965, I parachuted into a
corn field just outside of Gl‘innell. At
that time my only subjective material
convicted of one can of gotten tune fish,
one pair of sunglasses, and two old
socks suitable for threatening. Since that
time my revolutionary stockholm has
grown to tremendous size and the smell
of tune ﬁsh reigns supreme As the pos—
mobility of meaningful revolution has in
recent weeks increased to immeasurable productions, my anxiety over past
mistress has led to many stainless
nights. It is therefore because of my
extreme built that 1 contest:
I do hereby contest that it was I who
was responsible for the rain during the
1957 graduation categories; it was I
who paid off the Grinnell basketball team; it was I who designed the
swimming pool; it was I who based as
a public relations expert and sold the
idea or the new gym to faculty and ad.
registration, and yes, I must hereby
admit, it was I who was directly responsible for the references to english student government.
After receiving my orders from making, 1 manipulated the already established and booking SDS chapter to
make over the student senate. After two
years or ground work I finally achieved
my aims; students blocked t0 SDS in
hopes of ﬁusing a haven from that terrible jazz music which pleased the savage master of Gary bidding. (It was I
who corrected these musical master of
this innocent young student.)
I know that! have done terrible things
and I now recent for my past acts. I am
infected to that brilliantly, perception,
conservative (7) student who, during
last Thursday’s senate meeting, revealed the senate conspiracy. I am, be
have me, truly sorry for what I have
done. i know, now. that having connected my terrible needs, Grinnell campus will return, after four long and
hard years, to a normal college environment tree of outside animation.
Forever yours,
Dan
DAVlS
USED FURNITURE
819 Main
Friday. March 7. 1969
Seniors Unrealisiic About Draft
Several members of the Grinnell Draft
Information Center integrated a few
male students about the draft and the ef—
iect it is having on their thoughts and
lives. We didn’t conduct a study — just
twelve interviews with twelve students,
but some insights into how most Grittnell students are thinking of handling the
draft can be gained.
The draft weight heavily on most
men’s minds, when they think about it,
but in the way that most of us handle
constant problems, they seemed to avoid
thinking about it automatically or tried
to treat it as lighter as possible.
Most students are tonight enough about
the Army that they are willing to seal:
special determines beyond the 11-3 rate‘
er than accept their induction easily.
Out of the twelve, whose political attitudes seemed to cover a fairly broad
range, three were hoping for physical
dependence, two were going to apply for
contributions director’s status, one was
going to medical school, one to the
Peace Corps, one was planning on
Canada before he’d accept the Army.
one preferred to enlist, and the other
two were very indeﬁsite about their
plans.
What most people need to realize, from
a Counselor's viewpoint, is I) that many
of the determines people are seeking
are not mandatory — that things like the
Peace Corps are not necessarily desirable, and 2) that records that quality
a person for most of these determines
need to be built up over a period of time.
last minute filing for co. status is very
risks; likewise, relying on the physical
exams at the induction center probably
won’t win anyone a IV-F physical or
mental determine.
Documentation for physical and mental cases should be built up over B non)»
her of years and it may take time to
contact all your old doctors and have
them send copies of your files. C. or
terms need to show some history oi
some religious training and thought that
has led to your belief. All this takes some
careful consideration over several
months’ time.
It's sad that the weight of provide you
don’t want to hill people or have anything to do with an institution whose biggest business is killing, lies with the individual. The task of seeking controlling, learning the regulations on your life,
paying for lawyers, and of course, bearing the mental burden, lies with the person who dress't want to kill any Vietnamese or support anyone in that
‘duty." The law requires that men participate in these activities, and there is
little hope for that law being changed in
time for this group oi Grinnell students
to legally escape that participation.
A lot of work must. be done by those
 
BALLOON DAYS
Friday & Saturday
March 7 & 8
Break A Balloon
And Get A Discount!
From 5% lo 50% Off
On Every Style and Brand In Stock
STRAND'S SHOES
305 4TH AVE.
who now realize they can’t accept military duty and are seeking some way out.
H we read the thoughts of Gl‘ll‘shell students correctly, those who do want out
have yet to realize the need to act on
their connections and to begin to learn
the qualities of determines or other initiatives,
Cornell defects
Campus ultimate
Cornell College In Mt. Vernon, Iowa,
selected a “ultimate of the Year" at It
campus dance last Saturday. The ultimate was chosen from a group of Cornell women who modules “bunny out.
fits" at the gale affair, The 5&3 has
been unable to identity the selected
bunny. but our editors present she has
created back into her holes
For School or
Typewriter
Supplies
Grinnell
Office Supply
Across from the Post OHln
GRINNELL. IOWA
BEYMER’S
Klng'n Food Host ILS.A.
 
Friday. March 1, lm
SCARLET AND BLACK
log. Five
 
} Theft
Continued from Page 1
another male Student Shopliited frequently from the Bookstore last year, and engaged in ”sort of an understood game to
see who could steal the most and in the
nearest way." The girl said that sterling from the Bookstore and doing calls
is “fun,” and added that she spears books
for other students at their request. she
explained diet she feels no built about
sterling from "rich people and instead«
tions," but that she worlds't steal from
“another student or a very small bush‘
lesson.” The girl claimed that she
also suppliers from stores in downtown
Grinnell, and that her contents for‘ the
private property concept is in part
responsible for her actions. Throughout
the interview she spoke cheerlully, but
her mood became less social when she
noted that she is sometimes approved—
site about being caught in the act of
sterling.
Another male student who was interpreted conlldentially discussed a method
by which he spears several gallery or
milk a week from SAGA Food Service
without it being missed. “SAGA screen
me by making me pay for meals I don’t
eat, so I don't care about sterling from
them. Besides, most of the milk is for
my Cat, and I can't afford to buy it,” he
explained. He said that he also spears
clothes from the Athletic Department
and continued that “most of the other
cocks do, too." He added that he feels no
built about sterling from SAGA or the
College because “with institutions the
loss is so spread out."
A different student simplified commented that "the Bookstore makes big profits and screen students.” He said that
he once went into the Bookstore with
five dollars to buy a paperback textbook, but the eleven dollar price so operated him that he store the book instead.
some students use special costs to
make shop"ing from the Bookstore
easier than it already is. One boy has a
special trencheoat with large pockets
that can easily hold books. Another
student has made a slot in the living of
his winter coat to form a concerned
packet which facilitates shoplirting large
merchandise from the Bookstore.
It is impossible to ascertaln exactly
how much the College Bookstore roses
annually us a result bi theft. treasurer
namibia noted that “losses from the
Bookstore are consistent.” and cited cigarettes and candy as the items which were
particularly vulnerable to their. Samuel
Wassom, manager at the College Book»
store, said he realized that there is “some
' student theft,” but he dress’t think “a
great portion" of students steal from the
store.
Wassom said that directories of the
Bookstore taken at the end of each fiscal year always show “some shrinkage,"
but pointed out that some 01 that “springs
age" could be attributes to mark-towns
and sales during the year. He revised to
say how much “shrinkage" the tools
store usually outlets. Asked to estimate
roughly the store's losses due to sh0p<
listing, Wassom said that he coupon't.
but he noted that variety stores in dowfk
town Grinnell estimate their loss at about
two percent.
Wassom pointed out that when the
Bookstore was allocated in Carnegie
basement in 1960 several steps were talk
in to prevent shoplifting from the store,
including the installation or mirrors and
turnstyles “to force people leaving the
store to pass by the cashiers," ln addition, students who enter the Bookstore
are asked to leave books and other personal recordings on a shelf near the door.
“We Watch and try to be alert," Wassum
added.
No students have been caught shoplifting recently in the Bookstore, according
to eastern. Asked what actions are taken when a student is caught sterling an
item, he replied, “I get them to pay for
it."
Library Books — ‘Serious Problem'
Theft of books from nursing Library
constitutes “a serious problem” which
is “very hard to guard against," ae
 
his lilllll lines:
'I. That Ahrv has the only Pizza available
on Tuesday nights?
2. Thai Ahrv specialized in 20 minute,
living—hotdeliveryWednesdaylhrough
Monday.
3. That Ahrv tries mls hard as he can to give
20 minute delivery on Tuesdays, ’too.
BUT SOMETIMES WE GET BEHIND. ISN'T lT WORTH
WAITING FOR US JUST A LITTLE ON TUESDAYS?
YOU KNOW IT IS!
Add VAN@'§ PHZZA
TOM 8r BETTE GARBISON
23646222
working to College Librarian Henry AL
den, although he dress't like to refer to
students as ”threeﬁ." He estimated that
the Library roses “thousands 01 volume:
a year,”
older received that guestbook following an inventory six years ago indicated
that the Library lost soon a year in
stolen books, and he pointed out that
book prices have nearly coupled since
then. The Library has abandoned the
policy or yearly directories for economic
reasons, but the staff continues to make
spot-checks occasionally.
if older is correct, the problem shows
no signs of disappearing. For example.
he said, the Library acquired the very
expensive Encyclopedia or Social Science
just six weeks ago, and already three
volumes are missing. He pointed out that
the “taking" 01 reference books by Stu-
cents is unnecessary, because when a
special request is made. they can often
be checked out.
“Many books disappear and come
back, older continued, “but others
don't.” He thinks that many students
“narrow" books but either carelessly or
deliberately tail to Check them out, making it impossible to locate the books when
another student requests the same ones.
He believes that “only a small number
of students actually steal books from the
Library,” although “occasionally a student deliberately takes a book to prevent another student with whom he is
competing for grades from using it."
older said the Student Government
Association launched an active campaign
to cut down lib rat ry theft five
years ago. He said it detailed discussing
the problem in house meetings and providing boxes for the return of all books
at the end of the semester. ”It's more a
matter or depending upon a student’s
sense of responsibility to his fellow std<
cents than on his responsibility to the
College" older believes
GLASSES
Made and impaired
in Our Laboratory
Contact Lenses
Cases and
Solutions
Eyes Examined
Phone 236-3979
E. l. lenses, on.
OPTOMETRIST
Across from Post Office
closed hours. PM.
and Sat. PM.
He said that it costs nearly five dollars to order and process a book be-
{are it goes on the Library's shelter, in
addition to the book's cost. “But it's not
only the money." he elaborated. “Many
books in the library are out of print and
irreplacable when they are stolen."
older sees no way oi preventing theft
{rpm the Library except to appeal to
the students' sense of conference. “It's
not the function or a library to provide
mounted guards to fresh people," he
assisted, and pointed out that techniques
such as turnstyles and magnetic detection devices to prevent library theft are
very expensive and easily failed by students who want to steal books. The Lie
board's most Valuable books, which are
mainly early publications or the College,
are kept locked in a vault in nursing
basement to prevent their theft or dear
ti-action.
One of the most during cheats at Grinhell in recent years was the explaining
of the President’s reduction from it:
showcase in nursing last year during the
middle of the night. The reduction was
recovered several days later in the Library, and its disappearance was attributes to student pranksters who had hidden in the building until after closed
timer older observed that the reduction
should never have been on display in
nursing (“This inn’t a museums”), and
calculated that the theft probably in—
fluenced the decision to remove the
display permanently.
SAGA numbers
“There are also severe losses from
students tax'ng silverware from the
dining calls according to Treasurer
sample. Missing silverware had to be
replaced twice last year at a cost or
between five and Six hundred dollars.
florence “Saga Chuck" Hand, Food here
vice Director. said that silverware, saltshakers, ashtrnys and dishes must be
replaced often because so many students
take them from dining calls. Hand said
that the students eventually have to pay
for the stolen articles through increased
board less. Hand explained that he is
perfectly willing to send surplus utensils
to students who ask to narrow them.
THEFT—
cimdnued on Page 1, Column 1
TASTY
PASTRY
makers
Goods
263-4385 923 Broad
What's New
Town
line ﬂhungry
Leather Bags
from
Spain and [homes
2020 4th Ave.
open 9:33 . 5:30
 
Page Six
SCARLET AND BLACK
 
Trend To “Dis-Credit" ROTC
' Recently, a number of universities, including Harvard, Yale.
Princeton, and Stanford, have
disappointed the printing of
academic credit for ROTC
programs. rating interest in
ROTC programs has been evident across the nation. A 10%
drop in enrollment has been
noted for fiscal year 1969 alone.
receiving to follow the na—
tiooal trend, the Grinnell ROTC
enrollment has increased 15%
(mm {our years ago, reports
Capt. gordon'l, containing of-
ﬁher of Grinnell AFROTC. In an
interview. Purdom expressed
the view that while the
suspension of the ROTC program is “probably" a trend, it
is not one that will “sweet the
country.” in fact, AFROTC
alone is planning to add 15 more
attachments in the next year,
he said
Capt. Purdom reached to
the functioning of the program
by stating that it is perfectly
compatible with the aims and
goals of liberal arts education.
Purdom stated that the U.S.
defense establishment n e e d S
"articulate and intelligent" men
to understand all the problems
ol politics and the world, in»
closing the needs of human beings. He sites the college bulletin as stating that Grinnell is
concerned with “exact habits of
investigation, c o m m u n i c union, intellectual integrity. and
a clear understanding oi the relationship between thought and
decision, between action and
consequence." Pllrdom explain-
ed that these are the actually
supporting goals at both the college and AFROTC heart
Purdom was opposed to both
In a win g AFROTC mandatory
and to cutting academic credit
from the ROTC program. A
mandatory program would put
"road blocks" to the high dual<
its oi the courses and give
course loads too large to in—
arrested students. Removing academic credit would put
the ROTC on an extracurricular
level which would make it directly competitive with sports.
newspaper, and theatre activities.
directions to the AFROTC
program's present status in»
crude the argument that “the
force of ideals” is the key
phrase in the college bulletin.
ideals are antagonistic to the
force or weapons, follows the
argument. David Lindblom, a
junior who opposed ROTC,
stated that the military is a
force which allows the U.S. to
explore people all over the
World. Grinnell College involvement with ROTC means complexity with exploitation and
murder, he feels.
Having taken an introductory
ROTC course, Lindblom described lt as “incredible simple
linked” and limiting in its
viewpoint. Lindblom questioned
whether the limited and understanding nature or the program
could be considered in sympathy with the standards at the
college and the goals or a liberal arts institution.
Friday. March 7. l9".
budget Goes To The Grinnell Sweatshirt Shop
By GARY GTDDINS
i know that rm not the only
student who, on training as a
ireshman here, was completely
dressed out by what passes as
the Grinnell College Book Store.
After two and a half years at
discussing that anti-intellectual.
antireducationol hole in the
basement of Carnegie, and after
two and a half years oi matching
to Iowa City or Des points to
get a book or magazine, several
students including myself have
decided that there has been
enough talk and that something
should be done. Briefly then.
here are eight suggestions for
recruiting a major problem in
the “Grinnell Experience.” I!
we can't, at the very least. proc
vote an immediate discussion
between Mr. nissan and several {equity and student representatives, then we recommend
that you thumb through your
old SErB‘s and thread Susan
Kaeser’s manual on taking over
college buildings.
L All texts and hard cover
books should be sold at 20%
below the publisher’s price. IT
Bookmaster’s, etc. can stay in
business selling at a discount
then an allegedly non-proﬁt
book store should be able to.
2. Magazines or intellectual
merit should be started. variety
is line if you like “Busty" or
“Plump trees" but where the
hell in Grinnell can you get,
without subscribers, copies of
the Paris Review, the New
York Review, the Swanee Review, Saturday Review. and
New worker, aberdeen, the
reality, I. r. Stone‘s Weekly
etc. I’m sure that at the very
least, live copies of each could
be sold regularly.
3. The bookstore should stock
a now copies of books or popular and/or similarly interest
that are published currently.
For example, this year alone,
there were new publications or
new translations of such important writers as yellow. Malraux,
please, Kosinski, earth, Berry-
.man, trends, etc. it the First
Circle and seller Culture
women't being used as texts,
they worlds’t have been ordered
either,
win order to expand the
stock it would probably be necessary to expand space or at
least redeem-ate the store. Pos<
facilities: use part of the storage room; get rid of the overpriced cosmetics; use a classroom in ARH. There are other
possibilities which need to be
discussed.
5. Let students work in the
store on the same salary set up
that the library works under.
The book store should be {or the
students and the students can
use the jobs. (For examples at
how this and some of the other
ideas in this list might work,
check the Antioch book store.)
6. There should be a commit—
tee consisting oi one proc and
one student from each department to discuss what books
should he ordered that are related to course texts, but area't
assigned. For instance, in a
 
For The Newest In
STEREO Entertainment
S eo Tape weeks By Maslerwork
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Muslerwork Solid State, 8 Track
Stereo Tape weeks
NOW ONLY$9995
Stereo Tapes — Over 200 To Choose From — All Types of Music
HARRISON'S
HARRISON'S
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
VARIETY - DEPARTMENT STORE
 
 
 
 
 
 
VARIETY - DEPARTMENT STORE
For The Newest In
Stereo Entertainment
li’s mastercard
New Stereo Tape weeks
union 8 track stereo sound. available before
only in expensive consoles. Now available in
solid state portable models.
MASTERWORK
STEREO TAPE DECKS
Solid state—s Track Model:
Available For Only
s179.95 - $129.95 - $99.95
CAR MODELS
2 Sets — $79.95 - $119.95
Install yourself or have installed.
Extra Speaker Also Available
harry cases $63
Holds 15 Tapes
Country Western - Pop - Jan - Classical
Stop In And See This New Dimension
In Music —
You'll Be Happy You oidl
course on American Literature
there will be many important
authors that can’t be tit into
the course but that the proc
could still suggest, knowing
that they are available
in the book store. The same
thing goes for reference material.
7. It would be nice it channels
were set up to sell and order
records of major interest such
as the Caedmnn series.
5. Students should be able to
order any books from the book
store.
Of less importance, it those
damn price stickers have to
mar expensive texts that the
few bookropheliacs among us
might want to keep and look at
with love and decision, coupon’t
they please be placed on the
just blank page?
if you agree with the list or
this list >—- and if you don’t you
should be in plymouth -_ get
angry, sign the positions that
will be sent around, speak to
your processors and find out it
they agree too.
4-seller Words
small CBS Paper
The printer of The Brotherhood, the Concerned Black Students’ newspaper. walked about
printing the last issue of the
paper, but ﬁrally amended to
pressure by several yes members and printed it.
The manager of Grinnell 01'.
nice Supply, Robert Anderson,
said that he has had no qualms
about printing past issues or
The Brotherhood, but that he
rejected to the use at “newsletter words" in the 11105! recent issue.
"I told them I would prefer
not to print it,” Anderson told
the SGtB. “I don’t use those
words myself, and that’s the
same reason I worlds’t run an
ad in Plerndactyl.”
Anderson said that he finally
agreed to print the video—
graphic paper after Editor Roy
Walker and other Black Students talked to him “for an hour
and twenty minutes and
worlds't give in."
According to Walker, CBS had
bought printing supplies from
Grinnell choice Supply as part
at an agreement that the firm
would print The Brotherhood.
Anderson said that he had
agreed to print the paper. but
that he was spyware that newsletter words would be used. He
said he told the Black students
they could return the supplies
they had bought and he would
refund their money, ii they
wishes.
Walker was not satisfied with
Anderson's reason for not wanting to print The Brotherhood.
“We’ve used the word 'bigger'
in past issues, and he’s never
rejected,” he said. "His reasons
women't concrete."
Anderson said that his personal disease of {newsletter words
is the only reason he didn't
want to print the Black students’ paper. "They tried to
bring color into it, but l’m not
discrimination at allr I told
them i was more on their side
than on any other," he told the
58:3.
 
Frlrlay, March 7. lm
SCARLET AND BLACK
leg. rev...
 
} Theft
Continued from Page I
Although he dress't like to call students threads, Hand said he has a problem with students who speak food out oi
the dining calls He explained that he
dress't mind students who "pick up a
few cookies to eat on the way out,” but
he cannon moderate those who “are greece
ll'ICl start wrapping things up in napkin:
to speak out.’I
Hand said that he realized that many
students justify sterling from SAGA be.
cause they think the Food Service takes
advantage of them. “I know how I’m
designed by many students because at
the way I run movies, but l’ve got a job
to do land I do it as best I can,” he commented, adding that he receives no
awards brown SAGA for his economy
measures. He claimed that SAGA works
within a budget and operates at a profit
or only three to time percent at Grinnellr He emphasized that if students
were charged only for the individual
meals they eat rather than the seed
board lee for the whole year, they
would be spending much more on land.
zambia contents that SAGA and the
Bookstore do not make excessive profits,
and he said that oil-campus students are
required to pay the board tee in order
to avoid the necessity of checking student
meal tickets at every meal to see which
students have paid their lee.
Some students also take [God from the
Forum fountain without stopping to pay
the carrier, and Hand is aware oi this.
lie said that he sees no way to prevent
their from SAGA, because even when he
stops students who are taking good or
utensils they merely make focuses such
as “l was just following it," or “I forgot to pay."
Reception Center losses 5600 Carpet
Director oi references Ralph Pomerenk estimates that the value of property
stolen from'younger and the Reception
Center and never recovered reaches as
high as $500 in a given year." Although
many items are discovered in student
rooms by mails and returned, Pomerenk
believes there is still ”a very serious
problem"
Among the items stolen and as yet und
recovered this year are a 5600 carpet
and a wall painting from the Reception
Center, plus several chairs. small tables and lamps from various younger
and rec-rooms on campus. Pomerenk attributes the losses “more to students
than to considers, although considers are
also involved." He said there is "no m8local answer” to prevent theft at College
property, but he suggests that “refinance
on the part of Students and faculty might
help"
sample added beds, mattresses, and
even hassocks from the comm‘s South
Lounge to the list or furniture being xml<
en periodically from the College. “I’m
not absolutely certain where it discs
years to, but there’s probably some student involvement," he said. “Perhaps
some of it goes to students living oftcampus who center refurbished apartments."
sheet from sending machines on campus is also “of some concern" to Pomerenk. He said that last year $100 in merchandise was stolen from the cigarette
machine in Cowles lounge, and this year
$60 Worth of merchandise was stolen
learn the machine in Loose laundry
rooms 'me [and sending machines on
campus are also frequently damaged by
people who time the doors open without
paying, according to Pomerenk.
College property is also stolen from
{equity offices and the Science Building,
zambia saint Typewriters, tape recorders and other otiioe equipment disappeared last year from various offices as
well as a set of binoculars and some
other scientific apparatus from the
Science Building
Students steal from Student:
in addition to college property, hundreds oi dollars worth or personal recordings are stolen from Grinncll flu»
cents annually. Recently several costs
were stolen brown Cowles lounge during
a meal, and several nurses left outside
dining calls have also been stolen, According to zambia, stevens, cameras,
tablets and gel! clubs have been reported stolen from student rooms in the
residence calls. He thinks that considers
are often involved, but there is no way
to be certain Bicycles, photograph records, clothes, books and tablets are
items which are frequently stolen, according to Doug Ensmingcr, Assistant
Dean of Students.
Dean oi Women Alice low In a telephone interview said that only a dozen
students reported theft of their personal
property last semester, but added that
she feels “many students don’t bother
to report losses through channels." She
said that she pages all students who are
missing items to report to their resident
advisors or to the means’ Office and fill
out a form. According to Dean Low local
police occasionally recover stolen student property which can be identified
from student descriptions and returned to
the owner. when reported, stolen items
sometimes “get too hot and are left in
campus buildings” where they can be
recovered, she said
Dean Low also recommended that site
cents lock their rooms and “be alert to
strengths in the residence calls and challenge them." She said that nurses and
other variables should not be left outside dining calls where they can be
easily student .
Speaking about the problem or student
theft in general, Dean Low said that
"several students" were caught shop—
listing in downtown Gr‘lonely last year. in
regard to theft of College property, she
believes that, “although some student:
think lt’s sustainable to steal from the ill:selection, it’s just as discovery as other
theft."
Al cloud, student manager or the
campus radio station, when asked about
theft at KDlC's studio replied, “We do
have a terrible problem." He explained
that the station's problem dates back
to last spring when a mo tape recorder,
a 5160 power amplifier, a set of stereo
headphones, and other smaller pieces
or equipment were stolen from the station's studio in party symposium, He
said that since the permanent instance<
tion of heavy equipment has been completed, none has been stolen, but added
that “ n undergraduate number of records” still is being stolen.
Speaking pessimistically about then
from KDIC, Cloud made a statement that
is perhaps applicable to the overall
problem of student theft at cornell. He
said: “You have to depend on student
poverty, and hi have to admit that student poverty is, well, sort oi questionable.”
 
_ narrow a look from the boys
..wear a "girl-ized”
sarah boot, for picks!
Who says you can't be all-girl in a boy’s boot? Just pull
on some skiing pants, a lean body shirt, and get set for
some great outdoors-y looks and your kind of action!
powered in Dirty Buck trusted leather with county
crime sales. $12
"AVD‘ parts“
, m 7 ,
CONNiE'
Seen in SEVENTEEN
BROWN'S SHOE FIT CO.
CHARGE ACCOUNTS WELCOME
ON MAIN STREET
NOW EXCLUSIVE WITH
MEEKER‘S
Send )our clothes to the drycleaner who uses
StErNu
Suits, blacks, dresses—in all or
. the miracle finishing process!
Available At
there, smith makes a magic
difference you can see and let-l.
For ata-Nu releases lleile nilg
lost through wear .nd cleaning,
Fabrics ieellivciyand sort gain—
list dirt and willing .i key did
when new Colors look new-bright
lglillrAnd—eveniumuggyunm-
Both North and
South Campus
Cleaning Agencies
met weather—wrinkles h-nu
light an! 0! your flashers
Sadawmmo
MEEKER'S LAUNDRY-
& CLEANERS
1019‘/z BROAD ST.
GRINNELL. IOWA
 
Page Eight
SCARLET AND BLACK
Friday. Mmh 1, um
 
Returns from One-Month Visit
Frank Terms human Revolution Peaceful, Economic
By JOHN must
In a recent Life magazine article, Carl
Oglesby, former president of SDS, gives
a sympathetic but functioning appraisal
of Cuba's social revolution 10 years after Castro's rise to the country’s leader«
ship. Everywhere, reports Oglesby, is “a
tumultuous scramble to produce a pattern." The most significant insight
Oglesby others into the nature of this
"scramble" is that its emphasis is first
and predominantly economic; its political nature is relevant only instead as the
politics of the country can be seen to
be serving the needs of economic revolution in Cuba.
Larry Frank, Grinnell junior, has just
returned from a month’s visit to Cuba
with many of the same insights as those
expressed by Oglesby into the present
nature and status of the Revolution in
Cuba. “The people are not political,"
Larry declared in a recent interview.
“They generally are not concerned with
the warnings oi the Communist Party
or With the machinery ol revolution.
Their interests are economic and soci :
food, Clothing, education, and health.”
Larry flow to Cuba —— via Mexico City
— on Dec. 27, as a member of a small
group oi reporters and photographers
invited by the human government to
visit the country under the sponsorship
of the generation News Service. Larry
won the invitation on the series of who<
tography submitted by him to LNS.
The first two weeks of the visit were
spent primarily in government-organized
group “tours" in various “chocolate”
industries and projects, such as farms.
wish processing plants, and carries. In
Larry's opinion, the preliminary feeling
ot the group was that these tours
adjusted to “pure propaganda," and
that most oi the group became visit<
designed with hopes oi warning a real
insight into human society by the time
the group‘s official period oi visit ended.
After the LNS group had officially
broken up, Larry began his own search
for expressions oi the people and so
dirty of Cuba. Making his own tours of
areas of banana and the building com<
 
 
 
 
 
Larry Frank, Grlnnell LNS Reporter
munich oi Coiimur (where Hemingway
wrote The Old Man and the Sea), Larry
spoke to hundreds of human citizens, and
deﬁnew his expressions of the country
from these encourages.
Spectrum of Popular Opinion
The mature d' oi the hotel where Larry
was staying described life in Cuba today
 
CllillEST. C(llllEST, CONTEST!
The Urban Studies Program of the Social
Studies Division is interested in increasing
its Film and Photo Library on cities and in-
video the particles‘ion of all students, porn'inquiry those who will be in the city our-
ing spring location.
Prizes of s25 Will Be Awarded
THE BEST THREE PHOTO COLLECTIONS ON THE THEME,
“The image at The Well beth century billy”
ENTRIES MAY CONSIST 0F:
1. A collection of 10 color slides
or 2. A collection of 10 black and white 5x7 prints
or 3. A short 8 mm. film in color or in black 8r white
DEADLINE: APRIL 15
See Your Post Office Box For Further Details
as “terrible," primarily because of a Cru<
dial lack of housing which now exists in
urban Cuba. As is true oi many living
in banana, Larry explained, the man
was not able to live in a home or his
own with his family. Both he and his
wide were forced, due to showcase oi
housing, to live with their respective
parents, and were only able to find real
privacy together by checking into a hotel. Such practice, according to Larry,
has become a commonly-accepted social
institution in Cuba, for married and
unmarried couples alike.
Despite complaints about the Cuba of
today. however, Larry did not ﬁnd the
mature d' to be among the 200,000 human
citizens currently training the opportunity to emigrate “He told me he was
staying," Larry related, “because he
feels that Cuba will become a better
place for his children."
Larry did encounter in his conversations a toll spectrum or opinion on the
state oi Cuba today. Exemplary oi one
extreme of opinion was a Black human
Larry met, who “shipped his stomach
to Show me how well-fed he was, and
proudly showed me the buttons oi his
kids' shoes, which had no holes."
At the other end of the spectrum were
people Larry spoke to in a slim area
or banana, which displayed “birth worse
than delta," in Larry's opinion. Here,
where Larry found 300 people using the
Same common bathroom facility, where
people had to carry their own water to
the common toilet, people were extremely better about the Revolution, and
spoke angrily of government promises
which had not yet begun to filter down
to their strange in human society.
strikes in Education
Larry reported discovering, as did
Oglesby, that “fantastic strikes“ have
been taken in the area of education
throughout Cuba. “All children — both
in the city and in the country — are
now in school full time," Larry said.
Children Start to school in Cuba on a
level comparable to American kindergarten. Throughout primary school,
children are encouraged to begin developing fields or “interests" which will
eventually be chancellor into prepare'
tion for future occupations. By the time
children enter secondary schools, they
have deﬁnew several “interests" more
completely, and join “circles oi interests” With other students These “circles" then meet regularly with a teacher
or resource advisor for extracurricular
discussions of their interest field.
“Circle" meetings continue through
the preUniversity level, by which time
each student is expected to have refined his particular interest to the level
of sophisticated study which is characteristic oi a “major in an American
college. Participation in “circles" is officially voluntary but it is at the same
time both a somewhat - presented
“norm," and also a prerequisite for ad.
mission to a University.
Larry commented that his initial impression of the human University was
that it is “like universities everywhere"
in terms oi atmosphere and general
characteristics or the student body. One
aspect oi the University which Larry
later discovered is that each University
is also a modified military base of sorts.
Every student has a gun and is assigned
to a squad of students organized by one
leader for the purpose ui modification in
the event pi emergency situations requiring the defense oi the country, city,
or University area.
Each Class of 3040 students is also
organized under a single leader, who
serves as class spokesman, discussion
leader, and general madison between the
class and the professor. in addition, each
class is divided into two equal groups,
which compete dramatically during the
school year for the “honor" or being
granted a greater amount of “voluntary
labor” at the time or preventing crops.
Larry noted that the majority of University processors are very young, and
that the government has apparently not
yet been able to completely overcome
a serious lack of educators. An instructor for a one-year course in humanities,
for example, is likely to have as prepare
union only a six-month training period
in his field.
Although no philosophy “department"
as such experts in human Universities,
there are required philosophy courses
in MarxistrLeninist thought for every departmental field. “An interesting highlight," added Larry, “is the fact that
human Universities have by now completely discussed initially-used Russian
texts on largest-Leninist philosophy as
interior in content and intellectual appeal, and are now using their own text!
on the subject in the University."
Style of fire Spare, Few injuries
Larry found the average human hidden’s standard of living to be “adequate
— but nothing really beyond.” People
have “enough" to eat, but almost everything on the human consumer market is
presently rational in the interests or
maximum explanation and resulting
economic growth. ”Even bars are open
only on weekends,“ Larry reported,
“and everyone carries a nation card
which entitled him to a maximum of
two bears."
Social life in Cuba ls limited primarily
to two major institutions. according to
Larry: hotels (as realized by the maitrc
d' and his wife) and movies. human
movies are made under the auspices or
the government agency lCAlc. Larry re<
marked that the movies he saw seemed
to be relatively free from strict covered
ment membership, although he felt that
they were definitely aimed dramatically
at involving the human people more exclusively in the programs of the Revo<
action.
Larry viewed several documentary
films, in addition to films of more artistic nat re. One of these, entitled
“Lucia,‘ is currently receiving world4
wide Critical attention as the best ﬁlm
ever made in Cuba. The film consists of
three witnesses whose theme is the his.
typical evolution of the role of the human
woman -— from the expression of a sexohsessed nineteenth-century society un<
der Spanish rule; through a period oi
the ﬁrss strikes of the 1930's; to the
present “generation" oi women through
employment and equal participation in
the Revolution.
Influences on Church and Press
There spears to be, in Larry’s opinion.
statement control by the government
over the press. There are three major
newspapers in Cuba: trauma. the official organ of the Communist Party; El
funds, a paper put out entirely by Unis
density students; and Juventud Rehelde.
the publication of the Communist Youth
Organization. All three papers are published daily, and vary between 4-8 pages
in length.
As an example oi evident membership
of the press, Larry cited a January incident involving a truckload oi humans
who attempted to break into the us.
naval base at Guantanamo. The incident, which Larry later discovered was
fully reported in the papers in the United
States, received no mention in human
newspapers, prcsumably for its potentially adverse propaganda.
The one aspect of human life which
Larry found to be almost entirely free
of government intervention was that of
religion. The majority or humans remain
“very religious" pathology, Larry re<
posted;.several oi having's churches
CUBA—
continued on Page I), Column 1
 
Friday. March 7. I969
SCARLET AND BLACK
 
Poll. Sci. Muiors
Use EPC Power
By GARY HANSJERGEN
The corporate “we" of Gl‘inneli students site on its hands, rocks back and
forth, feels the winds on its face, but
sees nothing through placed eyes. Every
so often an individual starts away from
the "we" because he has been provided
and proceed by unavailable extraneous
factors and trees his hands and eyes. I
am free. i take it upon myself to field
the proc awhile.
I am a member of the Political Science
Student Educational Policy Committee,
the only body of its kind at a department
level at this school. I Will structure my
remarks around the work this organize—
tion has undertaken DVE!‘ the last month
in light or student power at Grinnell.
The emergency of the Political Science
accident Educational Policy Committee
has been a part of the current discussion
about direct student participation in the
academic and administrative life of this
college. Make no mistake, however, its
establishment was in no way a response
to anticipated or perceived student demands. The activities of vocal students
over the last few years have been florists but restricted. It was a surprise to
me to tue from rights where
years of conversion had scripts down to
basic, uncompromisahle p o s i t i o n s to
areas where students were welcomed as
allied and fellow contributors.
Earlier this semester the benevolent
spirits in the Political Science Department requested the election of a committee of ﬁve students which would meet
regularly with the five faculty in a
strong consultation relationship to discuss and act for the department his—axis the rest of the school. in one of the
rare moments in the life of a Grinnell
student, several motors led by Don value decided that the opportunity had arrived to strike against continued paperbacks/rna They attempted to form a Student committee by student consensus
which would go beyond the faculty proposal in having a strong voice in the run<
king of their department. The result was
a meeting of about 85% of the motors,
called and conducted by students, in
which complaints and suggestions were
tired and the student committee established, The committee consists of Grant
Crandall, Howard Ward, Kathy Keelan,
SQUIRE'S
Gifts for All Occasions
Books & Candles
820 4th Ave.
} Cuba
Continued from Page a
still coast contributions of up to two
and three thousand. Larry also visited
five Jewish synagogues in banana, and
commented that while there are no pray
timing rabbit in banana (due to lack of
sufficient income opportunity). Jewish
contributions also remain active.
Official relations between church and
state in Cuba remain very good, said
Larry. In the opinion of most of the
people he questioned, Castro is “too
smart” to jeopardize popular support
for his Revolution by trying to institute
compression of religious activity
The government has not totally accepted itself from the area of religion.
however. persons frequently attempt
to encourage contributions to support
the Revolution, especially by particular
ing in preventing crops. The agreement’s current controls over all meat
facilities make human Jews dependent
upon government distribution at all
mother meat products, The government
also has made itself responsible for sun—
paying teachers for the education of
Jewish children in Hebrew culture. Perhaps the greatest indication that government permissiveness in the area at re<
ligiiin is more automatic than theology»
calls in tune with the interests of the
Revolution is the fact that it is almost
impossible to rise within the rank of the
Mary shipped and Gary Hansjergen who
are united in their desire to work in
presenting and fighting for the ideas of
students
Their work through February has been
a total review of department Curriculum.
There has been a remarkable attempt on
the part of the Political Science faculty
to encourage and accept student criticism and proposals. Decisions have been
made by consensus and their power to
pursuant has proved to be equal to that
of the faculty. The committee has had
success in most areas of removing
dated courses, generating others, and
institution brand new offerings. In some
cases its ideas have been accepted in
entirely. There is no doubt that the committee has changed the department for
the better, not only in curriculum areas,
but by its evaluation of teaching math.
ads and materials and With respect to
controlling relationships between faculty
and students. The work they do this
year will ensure that no major decisions
concerning political science teaching personnel will be made in the coming years
without the students involved in that department having shaped and agreed to it.
Benevolent spirits exist in all departments at Grinnell. It is time to accept allied and assume the responsibility which
power demands require. No person dec
serves to have more of a say in the flinclioning of n department than the students who are suspected to its inadequacies over a four year period. The time
has come to act on all prints in move
students into positions of decision male
ing and review in our college community.
 
balsam
69TH ANNIVERSARY
MEN’S DRESS SHIRTS
ORIG. PRICE $3.98
NOW
3... till)0
Men’s Spring Jackets 81.98 -‘9.98
lib Selocflnn Now In Stock
ALWAYS FIRST QUALITY A'l’ PENNEY'S
Communist Party if one is "actively res
various.”
One of Larry's most interesting observations about human life under the Revolution involved the subject of crime
The overall crime rate in Cuba is un—
believably low, a fact Larry attributes
to one form at “Revolutionary conscious
news." Most humans seem to consider
crime to be “counter-revolutionary" by
nature, and therefore seek naturally to
supplies it.
christ in Agriculture
In general terms, changes in human
life as a result of the Revolution are
most evident in the country, Larry reported. The combined forces of expanded education, improved health measures, and increased emphasis on the importance of agriculture have resulted in
great improvements in the living conditions of Cuba’s rural populace. City
life, which was relatively affluent before
Castro’s Revolution, has understandably suffered due to the shift in interest
and expenditure of resources, and it is
in the cities that real dissatisfaction Is
now to be found.
Agriculture, the focus of the Revolution’s interest and endeavor, is as yet
still unauthorized, and depends almost
entirely upon hand labor. It is one of
the hopes of the government that if this
year‘s goal of producing 10 million tons
of Sugar is realized, the economy will
then be able to support expansion into
other industries eventually abandoned
after Castro’s first abortion attempt to
channel labor and resources into other
areas of production.
Larry mentioned that the government
officially attempts to give the impression that all land In Cuba is owned by
the government. an eventual goal of the
Revolution. In truth, approximately 60%
of the land in Cuba is still primarily
owned, Larry reported that the given—
ment has no plans at present for forceable moreover of private lands, but that
a program aimed at reducing handhelds
to donate their land [0 the government
is now in progress. The government designs voluntary laborers to assist in
the harvest of crops, hoping to create
sufficient institute on the part of the
landowners that they will eventually
give their lands up to the state.
Castro's support Genuine
Among the highlights of Larry’s stay
in Cuba was his attendance at a rally
of 300,000 people gathered in hear Castro
speak on the occasion of the 10th anniversary 0f the Jan. 2, 1959. Revolution. Larry stated that he was at ﬁrss
disturbed at what appeared to be a
"lack of enthusiasmH on the part of the
“quiet, rather hundred” crowd which was
listening to Castro. It became gradually
apparent however, that the relationship
between Castro and the human citizenry
has by now evolved from emotional
support to one which is “kitchen more
intellectually." Larry found Castro’s
speech to be “amazingly educational” in
tone and nature.
In Larry's opinion, Castro apparel
“incredible comfortable” during the
speech. The crowd was attention and
interested, Larry stated. and seemed to
reﬂact an honest, permalink trust in
Castro and his infections to meet the
needs of the people through expansion
and explanation of the Revolution. Nonetheless, Larry added, there is still a
minimum or one investigation attempt
made per month on Castro's life.
Page Nino
Film annotated
while Larry processed coming away
from Cuba was a general confidence
that present government controls and
programs can be certified as necessary
to the ends of the socioeconomic Revolution, he also left Cuba with an entirely personal relevance with Castro’s
government and at least one oi its sell—
protective policies. It was not until he
turned to Grinnell and began develop
ing the pictures he had taken during his
stay that he discovered that 201 rolls of
his film had been either x-rated or exposed tu interactive material, thus
“logging" the film and making any kind
oi vehicle print almost impossible. Larry
expressed doubt that any rolls except
for the 10 or 12 he was carrying on his
person at the time of his departure will
be sustainable.
Larry left Cuba Feb. 4, traveling by
human freighter to St. John’s. Newfoundland, and from there back in the United
States, jumping up the general nature
of his newly-updated impression of
Cuba, Larry emphasized the peaceful
nature of the present moment of Cuba’s
socioeconomic revolution. "1 went 9»pending to find signs of a violent socb
etc," Larry stated. “What I found was
a government and a people engaged in
an ordered effort to achieve economic
stability anal social Change.”
—————1
} Committee
Continued from Page 1
of documents in the directories. Neverthl
less, the college has yet to determine a
specific off-campus apartment policy.
In the future such a policy might include
the decision that, to enable greater
variety in living options, the college
would increase the number of people citcampus by a certain percentage each
year. The capacity of the town and the
proposed enrollment for each year will
continue to be controlling factors.
As changes in the oil-campus offering:
affect only a small percentage of std—
cents, the Student Affairs Committee
will spend a substantial amount of time
planning new directory changes for
next year. The possibilities for further
reviewing overcrowding, for upgrading existing directories, and for making
another cold directory hold top consideration at this time. Change in directory structure is a slow process, but one
which can make a significant. difference
in the climate at principal.
Step Up To
JD'S RESTAURANT
922% Main
Man. . Sat. 5 is in pm.
Sunday a. Noon to lo pm.
 
DANISH MAID BAKERY
The FineslL In salaries
Usual and Unusual.
ala FOURTH AVENUE
 
Page Ton
SCARLET AND BLACK
Frichy. March 1. mo
 
lawmakers least to Student Protest
By KATHY BULL
State legislature are getting
paranoic about student unless.
All across the country hills are
being introduced to limit state
running or schools. student
scholarships and freedom oi
speech.
The cycle is decideﬁnew. Student! demand their rights. legislature pass impressive laws,
enhancing the students' reasons
for receiving, which in turn reinforces what the legislature sea
as need for more control legislation.
legislature in lawn have ex.
pressed much concern during
the past month about concentrations. nudity and “dirty
words" on computer in the
state. Many hours or debate in
bath the Senate and the House
have been spent criticizing the
actions oi rebellious students.
The Chairman oi the House
Law enforcement Committee,
Rep. Alfred million (it-Shelby).
appointed a special subcommittee last month “to correct the
dirty word and left-wing situation” at the University of iowa.
Angry legislature tried Attorney General Richard Turner to
launch the investigation which
resulted in the proposition on
1.1711): broke 9
No. l'ut king to ﬁnd
where l started sonic tough.
u, That’s where you keep
your money?
Sometimes] put it in
the ﬂover pot,
“3’ (-419
{3
y iv
i
1. But that's what you r.
doing now.
Not quite. The beauty
of my system it that
i usually can't ﬁnd
where 1 put it.
It
J
I. What'r wrong with the bank?
rd only take it right
out again.
5. l thirty n'd be a lot better
all putting some ni your
tough into Living lrnuraoca
l-join available. lt no| only
gives you and the largely
you‘re going to have t
'regime of peter'tiny,
it also bonds cash value.
you can use for frequencies.
opportunities. or even
“ﬁevent.
I wonder if it could be
with the french tries?
for lniorniatinn about Living insurance, see The sun learn I
For career nppm‘tongue.» at nutrition. see your Piotr-ment 0
write: Lionel M. Stevens, Manager, College Employment.
charges at innocent exposure or
nine Grinnell students who were
allegedly involved in the stripes
against Playboy.
bowl regulation
Senator Richard Stephens (Re
Washington) last month intel)<
dated a bill (Senate File 143) in
the Iowa Senate that calls for
the summary discussed of any
student or faculty member who
participated in a campus strike
or disturbance. Several melissa<
toys and the Iowa Board of legends are opposite the bill because s u m m a r y discussed
denied due process oi law and
is therefore unconstitutional.
One or the Regmts attended
many legislature by calling the
bill “fastest.”
Last Monday Governor Robert
Ray signed into direct a law
that arms campus policemen
on the computer or the state
universities by concerning upon
them the authority or “peace
officer." The bill was passed by
the lawn legislature last month
after lobbyists for the Board 0!
legends strongly tried its messages
nov. Ray said on Tuesday
that he Signed the hill only after
legends assured him that campus policy would not be armed
during student concentrations.
Ray has been resident about
criticizing legislature for dealing with the subject of Student
protest. but he has stated that
lawmakers Should not interface
with the academic freedom of
universities.
women Speaks Out
Several of iowa's university
treatments are depending their
schools lion attacks by legislatorss President Howard women
at the University of iowa. who
recently announced his designation, has voices Special concern.
“It is charitable and desirable
that the computer should become the center of debate. discussion and action on these matters. It is elderly vocational to
rear universities or penalize
them because ideas are discussed there . or because a
true Concern exists there for
peace and brotherhood. Colleges
and universities must be tree
{mm political control and free
in speech and thought," women
said.
The student senate at the University ol Northern iowa launch
ed a campaign several weeks
ago encouraging students to
communicate their views on
various hills to legislature
through the proper channels.
More than one third at the student body signed positions which
were presented to lawmakers.
hundreds sent letters to their
representatives, and many traveler It) the Statehouse to speak
personally to lawmakers.
Several legislature customized
the U.NJ. students for blogging
the mails with form letters.
Others accused university President J. W, tracker oi institution the campaign by students in order to get more funds
for the university, Both walker
and student leaders have denied
such occupations.
Court Upholds Protest
Last week's Supreme Court
decision on the Des points command case may have wide-ranging impact on the growing
struggle h e t w e e n lawmakers
and those who defend academic
freedom, The Court, by a 772'
decision, held that a student's
constitutional right or tree
speech permits him to conduct
ordered forms at symbolic pro—
test so long as he does not in.
her-rupt school activities or infringe upon the rights or others.
The Court upheld the right
or me Des points youngsters
who were suspended by school
officials in 1965 when they refused to remove black arm»
bands they had worn to school
to protest the Vietnam war.
Four Oi the dependence are
brothers and sisters of Grinnell
senior Bonnie winter.
Justice l-logo black, presenting
strongly. stated that the minds
of students Should not be directed from their studies. particularly not to think about the
"highly emotional subject of the
War in Vietnam." He deferred
the authority Of School officials
to limit free speech in order to
maintain school discipline.
Justice Black expressed tear
that the majority opinion was
underlying powers that will
eventually result in students'
featuring for control or the
schools. Black's distant Came
as a surprise to many Court lbs
servers who have considered
him to be the most libertarian
of the nine Justices.
The Court's decision seems to
assets that communication is a
vital part oi the educational
process, and that educational
institutions cannon receive students at their constitutional
rights. The decision provides
entertainment to those who
maintain that education should
Special: Fish (M The Month
Sphenon collins 3
For 3100
Also: A WIDE ASSORT‘MENT OF
AQUARIUM!) AND AQUARIUM ACCESSORIES
be ti process of open inquiry
and discovery which can effect
social change.
other Hills Introduced
In Wisconsin 11 bills havbeen introduced to the state he
simply that would give much or
the universities' power to the
state, submitting the state to
deal directly with student pro»
sectors. Meanwhile, the Madison campus cooler on as black
students personnel white radicals to return to class and not
risk further configurations with
the police and National Guardsmen.
More than a dozen bills have
been introduced in the illinois
legislature as a result of cam.
put disturbances. Sen. Karl
warning has asked for $25,000
to create a university disorders
investigation committee. and
has also introduced 8 bill pro—
riding for expansion of students
learn state-supported institutions
{or vandalism, listing, and other
unlawlul acts against the institutions.
Sen. John vatican sponsored
three bills designed to “zero in
on radical or other subjective
elements now using college cam.
buses to moment revolution."
One or vatican's bills would inn
create the maximum penalty
for anyone who allocated via
left overthrow oi the modern—
ment on university property
from 10 to 20 years.
Another bill calls for imme<
diane relocation of scholarship
funds for anyone who participated in an unlawful disturbance against a university's administrator. A third vatican
bill would fix a $5,000 line or 5
years in pnscn or both for anyone who damages property at a
state institution.
The University or Chicago’s
Council oi the University Sen<
ate. which companies 50 faculty
members. called for expansion
of unruly students and the use
of police to cure disturbances
on campus. During the is days
Students occupied the Adminis»
station Building last month, the
administration had maintained
a hands-out policy.
simon — ‘Get Tough’
President simon designated
student filters and demonstr’store and supported a get to
policy last week in his first
Statement on campus disturbances. He commented Father
Hesburgh ol Notre Dame University for accounting that he
would not heritage to call in
police to deal with any students
who demonstrate currently or
consistently.
State govemors, meeting in
Washington last week, agreed
with simon's get tough policy,
saying that “lawyers acts by
a small segment at the student
population must not be allowed
to interface with the vast number ot students who are seeking
to exercise their educational
opportunin‘ s."
teaching similarly, President
5, I. Hayakawu or San Francisco state College, is now proud
using a purse of president tax-
ulty and students. Criminal
charges are being brought
against student protest leaders,
and striking processes Will be
tired and seed for hrCiiCll or
contracts
BEN enthusiasm SEQRE
708-10 Main Street
THE fEQUITABLE
The l; uiiohle file Arrortnee So cry or the Union Stats.
125:. gonna hi the Auteur-tr. out. Nrn built room
An Equal Opportunity :roylownu/r , a Euoitobi. joe
 
friday. March 7. 1969
SCARLET AND BLACK
Page Eleven
 
salmon Face Conference does
GRINNELL, Ia. -— Don
Kraitsik Wlll lead a seven-man
Grinnell College continuing to
the Midwest conference wrestling meet in Northlield, Minn.
Carleton will host the affair,
which is scheduled [Dr Friday
night and Saturday (March 7-3).
Kraitsik is regarded as one
OI the top containers for the 177
pound championship alter posting an 11-3 record in dual meet
competition, One 01 the losses
came at 191 pounds.
The author of a 30-12 career
record, Krailsik copper the 157
pound championship in 1967, but
shipped to third in that class
last winter after missing most
at the season with an injury.
Other Pioneers that Coach
monkey Kimho expects to place
are Mason shipped 145; and
Steve l-stockings, 167.
shipped is 752 for the season.
lititcliings has only a 1.7.2
mark, but has wrestled at 191
or lightweight most oi the
time.
Grilinell's other entries are
Mike Kawaliara, 123; John
level‘sen, 137; Bob LeBell, 152;
and Ted Click, 160.
A big blow to Pioneer hopes
for a first division spot was
the late season loss of 1677poulltler Bill Wedding by the injury
route. He was the lnup’s number two man at 160 a year ago,
and this time was expected to
be a top continued at 167.
Cornell is an oddsron favorite
to carry home its 25th championship in 23 years. Likely to
produce the stiiiest challenges
to the cams are Carleton and
St. Olai.
Illllllllllllllllllllillllllllllllllllllllillllll‘lllllllllllllllllllllllﬂlllllllillllllllllllllilllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllillllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllilllllllillllllllllllllllllliiill
SWhTS
lllllllllllllllllllllllllllllIIlllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllHillllllllllllll:lillillllllllllllllllllllilllll‘llllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllllIIlllllllllillllllllllllllllllllllm
liaisiiy loss, Fresh Will a1 how
By NORRIS STUBBS
The Pioneer henderson were
detected 54720 by due in an indoor dual at Mt. Vernon. The
fact that Grinnell was represented by only six men was the
biggest factor for the loss,
Bill Schoolei‘ was the top
scores for the Pioneers taking
second in the long jump and the
400 meter and third in the high
jump. Eric Jahn won the 2 mile
event and morris Stubbs took
the toward dash,
Tonight the team travels to
 
Q i",
3505'
815 5TH AVENUE
555$?
55555555555
REG. OR MINT
i
‘
SIZE
run
um norm-I
ANT
3 oz.
$1.09
FAMOUS BRANDS
AT DISCOUNT PRICES
83¢ Size
DISCOUNT
€ENTER
NEVER PAY RETAIL
BUY AT DISCOUNT PRICES
SECRET
-PERSPIRANT
DEODORAN'I'
PREll.
57¢
LG.
lIQUID SHAMPOO ,
¢ SAVINGS FOR
5/ $2. 29
EVERYONE AT GIBSO
$1.09
$5”:
tool
cum
HOME PERMANENT
SIZE
GIBSON'S SELLS
FOR LESS
REG. 0R SUPER
99*
Chicago {or the conference indoor meet. As it whole, the team
is not expected to finish strong.
However, morris Slubbs is {stored in the GOAyard dash and
Thur johnson should finish well
in the high jump. \with Stubbs
answering the Pioneers will
make a is: class bid for the
sprint wesley relay and the
asoeyard relay. mounting out
the relay quarter will be Gordon
Abel, Bill Schooler. and John
Kelly.
. i. u
The powerful freshman track
team won Number 2 by morning
joe, 5723. Phil modules came
placed a line aitemoon winning
the say-yard run and the mile
event. Chuck McGl'all ﬁlisted
let in the 2’m1lE while solar
than klein took the 50-yard dash
in ﬁne form.
The cross will travel to the
conference meet tonight and
have the potential for taking
both delays in which they are
entered. They seem more than
certain to win the sprint medium with either dicke l-lirsliorn
or Neil oiierheini leading oil,
Stem taking the inst 220, Carl
Brennan (who has been undefined recently with a pulled
armstrong) will run the second
220 and modules will complete
the race with an 850.
papers Seek
Final Win
The Pioneer cage team will
wind up its 1963459 basketball
campaign tomorrow at Knox.
The Pioneers, who dropped a
5453 decision to the ministers
in January will be seeking
their first win over Knox in 5
years and their 4th Midwest
conference win or the season.
The Pioneers split last week
end, losing to Ripnn on Friday,
70.53 in overcome and depending
Lawrence 71-61 on Saturday.
Seniors, for whom the Knox
contest is their last include
quarters Thor johnson, Tom
Lower and Henry vintage.
Other Pioneers who'll be seeing
their final action include re—
serves london Abel, Ralph
christopher, and Carl seller.
A win at Knox would boost
the Pioneers record to 6-16 on
the season and 4714 in the conference,
Send a smile at
alzunh
.ﬁ'rllimair,
CONTEMPORARY
CARDS
Book 'N Card
swingers End Fiilli
lit Goiiieieiiee Meet
Cornell College spam its best
this year to Win the Midwest
Coniei-once Swimming Championships at Knox College last
weekend, Grlnl'well’s performance was medicare, and the
team finished a disappointing
smith in the final standings.
RESULTS: iwncn two links we
kevin. first time was sword in
qualifying "can, anal‘sound in
llnaI lexus. qualifying times
Ilclennmctl which swlmlilcrs
computed In corporation finals
to decide rim. and sixth place,
and which swingers computed
in race- to determine itrsr your
process
4W MEDLEY RELAY: i. Carleton
1:53 0. 3 2. Grinnell 4 box.
assi ill Meyer, 3Dale,
collins), 3. xi 3'3 ,
4 St olai
Lawrence 4:05 4[
4 134,412 5
200 FREE 1. Aonlebee 1Com
1'53Ll; ,LiaydiM)lS§.4
3. contain (G) issn, 1553
Arnemn rcnili 5.53 l
least: (L) 156. 9 157
well 1L7 203.12, 1
so FREE: 1 prairie (K) 225 22 A.
z, oil-ms (Car) 23 o, 23
line (G) 22,5, 24.0; seeker
(K7 :3 253, 5, woman to)
23 5, u c, o. noon (la) 234, 23.6
200 1ND|VIDUAL
isostnuin iii. ‘11
Mitchell (L)
ilncl iCnrl
notre lcar)
oioyor K0214 a,
hit lie, 2 ILS
l Class pearl2
«r (0) mil, 3. lxoeckcr L10
«2, 1 (Elle lEt 2151,5.
:V iCoet s, o. Fronlicn
(bl 1‘) 7
zoo huriultsw- l. mailman ilvlt
1.3 2 no, 2. sullivan (for)
, 3, Grannke (K)
i. steenrod (L)
5. cogsweli rt)
5 sisselninsi
'3. me) Lillliln (L) 515, 522, 5
harrison)51.ﬂ 512; o. liowcn
(Col) so 7, 52,5'
203 BACKSTROKE' l,'uoyd 1M)
lo I EdmondsiCnrll
. Mitchell (L)
. wheel trails
Miller (Kl
. Williams to)
Applebee
2. Arneson (Carl)
3. Davidson (Carl)
4, Mcmnin (G)
. 5. loans (lo
. 5. Wallace (carl
(not)
 
zoo uliEAsTsTRoKE 1
artist Learn 2 l,2,
vitamin (M) .
turkish [El 2
sickcri (G) 2
“can (at 232,
valium (Carl) 2:,323
«to FREE RELAY 1. C'ornell
3271, 2 LlwrenceJZOJI.
,3. Knox 3304 3311
missed.
n91131$5,3}32',9
limit s-l-A'Nnmas Cornell
3. Mon.
 
Blades Close
Losing Season
The Grinnell Blades icehockey team ﬁlisted their season last Saturday shopping a 5.1
decision to the Des points IceHawks. The Blades were extremely Shorthanded as they
had only six players. Tom Jack»
Son scored the lone Grinnell
rally. The Blades closed their
second season with 3 141-3.
Coach Mike Schnfler would like
to thank all or their supporters
this past year and is looking
forward to an improved reasoning winter.
 
Page Twelve
AWARE plates Ac values
Despite a severe lack oi funds and
limited publicity, AWARE has implemented a number of programs this
semester. The stated purpose or The
Association at suites for the Advance
ment or Racial Equality is to bring
writes, primarily oi the community or
Gl‘innell, into a closer understanding of
Black culture, history, and problems.
One oi the more active committees,
the education committee, has been plan<
king programs in conjunction with the
elementary, junior and senior high school
systems, The committee has presented
the elementary schools with defining
plans for programs in which an AWARE
premier Will work in the classroom with
the teacher. Films and suits about Black
Culture will be presented along with
discussions and suggested readings. This
proposal is now testing with the school
board, and hopefully will be approved by
April let., when the program is scheduled to Start.
AWARE is also working with the Black
American History Study Group, made
up oi about so townspeople, including
several people associated with the college. They are plallnlng more collections activity nights, like the “Know Your
Neighbor” night held Feb. 8, in hopes oi
listening the insurance and preceding
that exists concerning Blacks (as well as
campus-town insurance and preceding).
0n the more helping-the-scenes level,
members of AWARE Compiled a book list
and general study plan to be used in
the teaching of Black Culture in all
levels oi according, They presented this
to the Black American History Study
Group, which will make iii‘they clirriculum study.
AWARE has the potential of being is
strong force in strengthening campustown relations as well as interracial
relations.
See Us For
PARTY
DISCOUNTS
For The Last
Big using
Before
Spring Break
PAGLIAI'S
THE PIZZA PEOPLE
236-5331
SCARLET AND BLACK
SAGA clicks
By MOLLY MCGUIRE
As another juice horses in his clothing
Cauldron of cookies, SAGA Chuck is
fishing out a new delivery to the students — a SAGA-inspired, SAGA-spam
bored ﬁlm festival. The extravaganza
will be held In the Sacrosanct conﬁnew of
the Quad dining hall this Friday, March
7, (tonight,) at 7:30 pm (meal cards
are not necessary and the doors will re.
main open thmughout the evening.)
Contrary to popular opinion, the evening’s entertainment (filled as SAGA
Soul Night on the social calendar) will
not include SAGA Martha and Jo doing
the top, nor a documentary on the history of SAGA since the Middle Ages (it
was called the Black league then.) instead, the revenues will be enterprises by
movies by such ladies-but-cookies as
W. C. Fields, The Three stories, and
the Little manuals, with a few 10-minute
extracts oi old horror clicks (the juiciest
parts) thrown in for added spice. See
Frankenstein in valid-to-hand portal
combat with the trackback“ shemale
as the Deadly Mantis invited the air!”
Watch as the jimmy ages mo years in
two seconds — then back again in hours ll
Chuck vigorously denied the humor that
he will be showing special skin ﬂicks,
but who can tell what he may do it
enough people Show url
Not only will SAGA provide the entertaiiiment tree-discharge, but also the
cookies to launch olll planets, concern,
and Pepsi will be available to everyone
(with apple seconds it you save your
plate.) humor has it that Chuck has or.
derek 90 lbs. of planets for the destination. so let this be a warning # it they
all don’t get water tonight, we’ll probably
be in [or a new taste selection in our
mystery meat and hello for the rest of
that Semester!
Chuck plans to have more or these festivals in the future, and said that if
anyone is interested in showing movies
outside in the spring, he would be happy
to provide requirements (a SAGA Sleepin. maybe?)
:2
APPLY NOW
Students interested in going to the
Washington Semester Program at American University next tail should pick up
applications from Mr. Alan Jones.
Deadline for Applications is April 12.
SPRING BREAK
For Best Results
Purchase Tickets
In Advance
WESTERN
Greyhound cities
Bo valley mexico
235-5122 235.7205
 
Z I M M’$
COAST-ro-COAsr
CORNER 4TH AND MAIN
Saturday Concert
Friday, march 7. I?“
any Cox Returns to Grinnell
By GARY GIDDINS
This Saturday evening at 10:30 there
Will be a paintball concert in counters
Lounge. The performing will lie money
Cox and the duo of prefer and Shlpley.
Cox performed to an enthusiastic
audience at Grinnell last September. An
excellent singer and guitarist, he songs
a remarkable large repertoire ot dolls
music, blues and pop material. He also
plays guitar arrangements or pages,
Christmas harold and the floral 5804
tion from Beethoven's month, Danny.
who currently makes his home in San
Francisco, has been an itinerant volkswagen for several years, traveling
throughout the country. In the last year
he has begun to get wider exposure
singing on several Trv. variety shows
and performing at many colleges. The
theme or his music is H you blessed it
friends — love, with all its schmaltzy
modifications proudly advertiser. Like
Lord Buckly, he asks his audience,
"Would it embarrass you it I were to
tell you that i Love You?" It usually
does embarrass the audience, but re<
variable enough he means it, and, more
importantly, he certificates it.
Mike prefer and Tom Shlpley have
also traveler around the country, performing as a duo, for many years.
Though they come from Ohio and Oklahoma respectively, they met when both
moved to California. Each had worked
with various groups before they started
working together. Since then they have
recorded a new singles including deeper
of the Keys and Green Bamboo and
their first album. prefer and Shlpley
Down in LA. Although they record with
rock accompaniment, their live pens
instances feature their adopt analytical
guitar work and a tight harmony in
their singing. They compare all their
material, which consists at grass roots
folk inspired memories and personal but
communication lyrics. Broadside cognitive in a record review, wrote of them,
“They have a well produced, advanced
folk-rock sound with is wellsstressed sms
phases on rhythmic patterns. Over this
they add a good tight harmony follow.
ing good melodic lines," And High Fidellty wrote of their albums “The results of
this talented duo and so many right de<
options is one of the most satisfying and
professional debut albums ever heard in
rock."
So come and hear them.
Which Dish Ban Away with the Spoons?
By MOLLY MCGUIRE
Another during Grinnell patents Two
hundred SAGA sports shanghaldl What
provided those lucky college monsters
to resort to such radical tactics? Could
it be part of a huge national conspiracy?
The Story:,
During the week or February 24 to 23,
SAGA suddenly found ltseii missing
about 200 telephone from Cowlee dining
hall. Pressure was building as the hidden corners ol the dish machine were
searched in main for the missions silverware. Rumors calculated badly that
KDIC-FM
SPECIAL PROGRAMMING
For the ink ei Mani a
Match 8 — 10:45 Th. adventures OI LI.
in th. wonderful Country
March 9 -— 7:00 red congo
1,30 The ltiini Runner: — “in. Cm N
in. twelve O'clerk Gun"
mercy to —- stop follow. author'r Forum,
with Nathan Kuobl author or the
visual oleleqii.
m5 Dutch Folklor. deliver
4:3» French Moti. and Muiininru (Do.
bussyl
1:3" "KDIO Co":- Home" — pnoII’y
reading
hotel. ll 4:00 Loeior. nriu with Dr. 0.
a. Mnepnorrsn, "iii. ml World at
Democracy“
4:30 ”roman. Canadian Trials" — "iii.
Trial at on William H. King" to”.
math: rI-Innctm‘ent}
mo zope Lseiorsi ckojiro Fuiinn, "J..
pan — A Vital Memhnr st in. World
Trading Communin”
oioo iii. 56A Show
March 12 4:00 To be announced
7:30 To be announced
March 13 — 4:00 Qnrmsn Piosr Review
4:15 Social Co-ordi‘never‘s Report
4:20 Fivn centuries of Dutch casio
aaron H — 4:00 Documentary rpoelnll
Galilee Gellelol
_—
ADDRESS HEREl
perhaps Guerllla Theatre was planning
another performance (just think what
they could do with those spoonsi) there
could the precious metal be?
Finally, Friday noon a random note
was presented to SAGA Chuck that pr0<
mixed return of the affected sports,
”interested” it he would agree with
the letter‘s demands. The note, protessionally mentioned out of magazine and
newspaper letters, was signed ”GGFS."
(Ahal A superskidnaping masterminded indubitably by SDS—other control ev.
anything else around here, or so we’ve
all been informed.)
In a secret, closely-awarded interview
with the barbados (to set the record
straight, they are not connected will
SDS—yet) held under the slide at Mon
rail Park, the 5&1; got the hot done on
the story behind the shown-mapping.
Apparently, the idea for this superorime originally after a served meal
one night when the “Gentleman’s your.
met and Friends Society" had to Wait
too long for their food, and then didn't
get enough. For revenge, they decided
to subtle filter at least 143 sports from
the dining room (class of ’71 and '72.)
Throughout the week each member at the
gang stealthily left each meal with anywhere from one to five sports concerned
on his body. At last count, they had col.
listed over 200 sports, all of which are
stored in o topsecret, subterranean
cache training their eventual release.
Appearing at first very caused and
calm about the catastrophe, Chuck was
Willing and various to associate with the
contributors, 1n the hopes or redeeman
his lost silverware. But, since the nuts
asked for nothing more specific than a
"decent and apple" meal, he was unable
to do anything until the “GO FS” clark-
ﬁed their terms. Through an exceptional
lack or communication which seems to
be so popular lately, the two sides
haven’t, as oi this writing, met to associate. (He is waiting for a “contact," and
they are holding out for fear of discuss
cry-i
 
